Utah statutes.
11-25-12.   Equal opportunity requirements.

The agency shall require that any residence which is rehabilitated with financing obtained under this part shall, until that financing is repaid, be open, upon sale or rental of any portion thereof, to all regardless of race, creed, color, sex, marital status, or national origin. The agency shall also require that contractors and subcontractors engaged in residential rehabilitation financed under this part shall provide equal opportunity for employment, without discrimination as to race, color, creed, sex, marital status, or national origin. All contracts and subcontracts for residential rehabilitation financed under this part shall be let without discrimination as to race, color, creed, sex, marital status, or national origin.

